Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 3. Purposes and Powers

§ 17-19-301.
Purposes.

Every corporation incorporated under this act has the purpose of engaging in any lawful activity unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the articles of incorporation.

A corporation engaging in an activity that is subject to regulation under another statute of this state may incorporate under this act only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both subsections, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

Cited

in

Arychuk v. Star Valley Ass'n, 997 P.2d 472,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 17-19-302.
General powers.

Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its affairs including, without limitation, power:

To sue and be sued, complain and defend in its corporate name;

To have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and to use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing or in any other manner reproducing it;

To make and amend bylaws not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for regulating and managing the affairs of the corporation;

To purchase, receive, lease or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal with, real or personal property or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

To purchase, receive, subscribe for or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge or otherwise dispose of, and deal in and with, shares or other interests in, or obligations of any entity;

To make contracts and guaranties, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue notes, bonds and other obligations, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises or income;

To lend money, invest and reinvest its funds and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment, except as limited by W.S.

17-19-832

;

To be a promoter, partner, member, associate or manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust or other entity;

To conduct its activities, locate offices and exercise the powers granted by this act within or without this state;

To elect or appoint directors, officers, employees and agents of the corporation, define their duties and fix their compensation;

To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts and other benefit and incentive plans for any or all of its current or former directors, officers, employees and agents;

To make donations not inconsistent with law for the public welfare or for charitable, religious, scientific or educational purposes and for other purposes that further the corporate interest;

To impose dues, assessments, admission and transfer fees upon its members;

To establish conditions for admission of members, admit members and issue memberships;

To carry on a business;

To do all things necessary or convenient, not inconsistent with law, to further the activities and affairs of the corporation.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(x), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

Imposition of dues, assessments, or fees. —

The power under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 17-19-302(a)(xiv) for a corporation to impose dues, assessments, admission and transfer fees upon its members, must be read in pari materia with §

17-19-613

, which provides that an article, bylaw or corporate resolution authorizing dues, assessments or fees is not, by itself, sufficient to impose liability without the consent or acquiescence of the member, so as to make the member liable for the same. Goglio v. Star Valley Ranch Ass'n, 2002 WY 94, 48 P.3d 1072,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2002), overruled in part, LS v. JEQ (In re Order Imposing Sanctions on Mears), 2018 WY 109, 426 P.3d 824,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2018).

Quoted

in

Arychuk v. Star Valley Ass'n, 997 P.2d 472,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 17-19-303.
Emergency powers.

In anticipation of or during an emergency defined in subsection (d) of this section, the board of directors of a corporation may:

Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee or agent; and

Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

During an emergency defined in subsection (d) of this section, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise:

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need be given only to those directors whom it is practicable to reach and may be given in any practicable manner, including by publication and radio; and

One (1) or more officers of the corporation present at a meeting of the board of directors may be deemed to be directors for the meeting, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum.

Corporate action taken in good faith during an emergency under this section to further the ordinary affairs of the corporation:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee or agent unless the action violates standards otherwise set forth in this act.

An emergency exists for the purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some extraordinary event.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to emergency bylaws and powers, see §

17-19-207

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c)(ii), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

§ 17-19-304.
Ultra vires.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the validity of corporate action may not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked power to act.

A corporation’s power to act may be challenged in a proceeding against the corporation to enjoin an act where a third party has not acquired rights. The proceeding may be brought by the attorney general, a director or by a member or members in a derivative proceeding.

A corporation’s power to act may be challenged in a proceeding against an incumbent or former director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation. The proceeding may be brought by a director, the corporation, directly, derivatively, or through a receiver, a trustee or other legal representative, or in the case of a public benefit corporation, by the attorney general.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Ultra vires claims held frivolous. —

Association members' ultra vires claim against appellee former association managers was not only not cogent, but frivolous because the exception of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 17-19-304(b) was not applicable in that the action was not one to enjoin any corporate act and thus the members' claims were barred under § 17-19-304(a). Furthermore, because the claims were brought in bad faith and appellants failed to cite the relevant statutory provision, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 17-19-630(d), appellees were entitled to reasonable expenses, including counsel fees incurred in defending that claim. Mueller v. Zimmer, 2005 WY 156, 124 P.3d 340,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 2005).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Hicks v. Dowd: The End Of Perpetuity?”, see 8 Wyo. L. Rev. 25 (2008).